California statutes. Public Resources Code
 emissions of greenhouse gases as an alternative to the strategy developed pursuant to subdivision (b) if that program is expected to achieve substantially equivalent or better increases in energy efficiency and reductions of the emissions of greenhouse gases, and if that program guarantees substantially equivalent or stronger tenant protections.

(d) In developing the strategy pursuant to subdivision (b), the commission shall consider input from affected stakeholders, including all of the following:

(1) Members of under-resourced communities and community-based organizations representing tenant advocacy, equity, and environmental justice concerns of under-resourced communities.

(2) Representatives of local city or county government.

(3) Owners or operators of affordable housing.

(4) Groups representing low-income residential and small commercial tenants, including organizations that provide legal services to those tenants.

(5) Providers of energy efficiency, renewable energy, and building decarbonization equipment and services.

(6) Labor unions that represent workers who implement building upgrades related to, or who manage or service, the energy infrastructure of covered buildings.

(7) Technical building design professionals.

(8) Facility operations professionals.

(9) Multiunit residential building owners.

(10) Nonresidential building owners.

(11) Energy utilities.

(e) In order to ensure equitable participation and input from stakeholders representing under-resourced communities, low-income residential tenants, and small commercial tenants in the development of the strategy pursuant to subdivision (b), the commission shall do all of the following:

(1) Contract with one or more organizations with experience representing under-resourced communities, low-income residential tenants, and small commercial tenants to
 advise the commission on the development of the strategy.

(2) Consider the feedback and recommendations from each advisory organization contracted with pursuant to paragraph (1) on the proposed strategy in advance of adopting any final strategy and, to the extent that any recommendations are not adopted in the final strategy, provide a written explanation of why the recommendations were not adopted and how the final strategy attempts to address the issues raised in those recommendations in an alternative way.

(3) In consultation with the advisory organizations contracted with pursuant to paragraph (1) and other stakeholders, develop metrics that could be used if the strategy is implemented to measure how the strategy is impacting under-resourced communities, low-income
 residential tenants, and small commercial tenants, and assess whether the strategy is achieving just and equitable outcomes.

(f) (1) On or before August 1, 2026, the commission shall submit to the Legislature the strategy developed pursuant to subdivision (b) and recommendations for further legislative action that would help achieve the objectives described in subdivision (c) if the strategy is implemented.

(2) The commission may submit the strategy and recommendations to the Legislature as part of a report otherwise submitted to the Legislature.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 378, Sec. 3.   (SB 48)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

25402.17.

(a) The commission shall evaluate the cost-effectiveness of passive house energy efficiency standards by California climate zone, using commission-adopted metrics such as long-term system cost.

(b) The commission shall evaluate the use of the two passive house energy models currently required for passive house certification in its analysis and the cost-effectiveness of passive house construction compared to existing construction under Part 6 (commencing with Section 100.0) of Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations.

(c) The evaluation of the cost-effectiveness of passive house construction
 conducted by the commission pursuant to this section shall comply with the requirements of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 25402. 

(d) (1) On or before July 1, 2028, the commission shall submit a report to the Legislature documenting its findings and recommendations.

(2) The requirement for submitting a report imposed under this subdivision is inoperative on January 1, 2032,
 pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.

(3) The report to be submitted pursuant to this subdivision shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 145, Sec. 1.   (AB 368)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

25403.

(a) By January 1, 2021, the commission, in consultation with the Public Utilities Commission, the State Air Resources Board, and the Independent System Operator, shall assess the potential for the state to reduce the emissions of greenhouse gases in the state’s residential and commercial building stock by at least 40 percent below 1990 levels by January 1, 2030. The assessment shall include consideration of all of the following:

(1) An evaluation, based on the best available data and existing analyses, of the cost per metric ton of carbon dioxide equivalent of the potential reduction from residential and commercial building stock relative to other statewide greenhouse gas emissions reduction strategies.

(2) The cost-effectiveness of strategies to reduce emissions of greenhouse gases from space heating and water heating in both new and existing residential and commercial buildings.

(3) The challenges associated with reducing emissions of greenhouse gases from low-income housing, multifamily housing, and high-rise buildings.

(4) Load management strategies to optimize building energy use in a manner that reduces the emissions of greenhouse gases.

(5) The potential impacts of emission reduction strategies on ratepayers, construction costs, and grid reliability. In assessing the impact on grid reliability, the commission shall account for both of the following:

(A) The commission’s 2019 Building
 Energy Efficiency Standards, effective January 1, 2020, that propose to require solar energy systems on all new single-family and low-rise residential dwellings.

(B) The increased load and impact on electrical infrastructure due to transportation electrification.

(b) (1) By June 1, 2021, the commission, pursuant to Section 9795 of the Government Code, shall report to the Legislature the findings from the assessment.

(2) Pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, this subdivision is inoperative on June 1, 2026.

(c) Beginning with the integrated energy policy report due on November 1, 2021, and in all subsequent integrated energy policy reports, the commission shall include a report on the emissions of greenhouse gases,
 based on existing data, associated with the supply of energy to residential and commercial buildings, by fuel type. The commission shall make this information publicly available on its Internet Web site.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 373, Sec. 2.   (AB 3232)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

25403.2.

(a) Using the moneys appropriated pursuant to Items 3360-105-0001 and 3360-005-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2021, the commission shall implement and administer a statewide program to incentivize the construction of new multifamily and single-family market-rate residential buildings as all-electric buildings or with energy storage systems. The commission shall provide a combined incentive if a building is both all electric and has an energy storage system.

(b) The program implemented and administered pursuant to this section shall be known as the Building Initiative for Low-Emissions Development Program Phase 2.

(c) In implementing and administering the Building Initiative for
 Low-Emissions Development Program Phase 2, the commission shall do all of the following:

(1) Before June 30, 2022, develop and approve program guidelines in a public process. The Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) does not apply to the development and approval of the guidelines.

(2) Make program applications available within 30 days of the commission approving the guidelines pursuant to paragraph (1).

(3) Ensure, to the extent reasonable, that the program incentivizes the construction of buildings as all electric or with energy storage systems that would not have otherwise been constructed as all electric or with
 energy storage systems but for the Building Initiative for Low-Emissions Development Program Phase 2.

(4) Ensure, to the extent reasonable, that the program incentivizes the installation of technologies not otherwise required pursuant to the applicable local and state building codes.

(d) A goal of the Building Initiative for Low-Emissions Development Program Phase 2 is to spur significant market adoption of all-electric buildings and energy storage systems.

(e) The commission may pay an incentive upfront if not doing so would inhibit participation in the Building Initiative for Low-Emissions Development Program Phase 2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 61, Sec. 3.   (AB 205)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

25403.5.

(a) The commission shall, by July 1, 1978, adopt standards by regulation for a program of electrical load management for each utility service area. In adopting the standards, the commission shall consider, but need not be limited to, the following load management techniques:

(1) Adjustments in rate structure to encourage use of electrical energy at off-peak hours or to encourage control of daily electrical load. Compliance with those adjustments in rate structure shall be subject to the approval of the Public Utilities Commission in a proceeding to change rates or service.

(2) End use storage systems which store energy during off-peak periods for use during peak periods.

(3) Mechanical and automatic devices and systems for the control of daily and seasonal peakloads.

(b) The standards shall be cost-effective when compared with the costs for new electrical capacity, and the commission shall find them to be technologically feasible. Any expense or any capital investment required of a utility by the standards shall be an allowable expense or an allowable item in the utility rate base and shall be treated by the Public Utilities Commission as allowable in a rate proceeding.

The commission may determine that one or more of the load management techniques are infeasible and may delay their adoption. If the commission determines that any techniques are infeasible to implement, it shall make a finding in each instance stating the grounds upon which the determination was made and the actions it intends to take to remove the impediments to implementation.

(c) The commission may also grant, upon application by a utility, an exemption from the standards or a delay in implementation. The grant of an exemption or delay shall be accompanied by a statement of findings by the commission indicating the grounds for the exemption or delay. Exemption or delay shall be granted only upon a showing of extreme hardship, technological infeasibility, lack of cost-effectiveness, or reduced system reliability and efficiency.

(d) This section does not apply to proposed sites and related facilities for which a notice of intent or an application requesting certification has been filed with the commission prior to the effective date of the standards.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 664, Sec. 184.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

25403.8.

(a) The commission shall develop and implement a program to provide battery backup power for those official traffic control signals, operated by a city, county, or city and county, that the commission, in consultation with cities, counties, or cities and counties, determines to be high priority traffic control signals.

(b) Based on traffic factors considered by cities, counties, or cities and counties, including, but not limited to, traffic volume, number of accidents, and presence of children, the commission shall determine a priority schedule for the installation of battery backup power for traffic control systems. The commission shall give priority to a city, county, or city and county that did not receive a grant from
 the State of California for the installation of light-emitting diode traffic control signals.

(c) The commission shall also develop or adopt the necessary technical criteria as to wiring, circuitry, and recharging units for traffic control signals. Only light-emitting diodes (LED) traffic control signals are eligible for battery backup power for the full operation of the traffic control signal or a flashing red mode. A city, county, or city and county may apply for a matching grant for battery backup power for traffic control signals retrofitted with light-emitting diodes.

(d) Based on the criteria described in subdivision (c), the commission shall provide matching grants to cities, counties, and cities and counties for backup battery systems described in this section in accordance with the priority schedule established by the commission pursuant to subdivision (b). The commission
 shall provide 70 percent of the funds for a battery backup system, and the city, county, or city and county shall provide 30 percent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 353, Sec. 20.   (AB 1533)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

25404.

The commission shall cooperate with the Office of Planning and Research, the Resources Agency and other interested parties in developing procedures to ensure that mitigation measures to minimize wasteful, inefficient, and unnecessary consumption of energy are included in all environmental impact reports required on local projects as specified in Section 21151.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 276.)
-------------------------------------------

25405.

A city, county, or city and county may by ordinance or resolution prescribe a schedule of fees sufficient to pay the costs incurred in the enforcement of standards adopted pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 276.)
-------------------------------------------

25405.5.

(a) As used in this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “kW” means kilowatts or 1,000 watts, as measured from the alternating current side of the solar energy system inverter.

(2) “Production home” means a single-family residence constructed as part of a development of at least 50 homes per project that is intended or offered for sale.

(3) “Solar energy system” means a solar energy device that has the primary purpose of providing for the collection and distribution of solar energy for the generation of electricity, that produces at least one kW, and not more than five
 megawatts, alternating current rated peak electricity, and that meets or exceeds the eligibility criteria established pursuant to Section 25782.

(b) A seller of production homes shall offer a solar energy system option to all customers that enter into negotiations to purchase a new production home constructed on land for which an application for a tentative subdivision map has been deemed complete on or after January 1, 2011, and disclose the following:

(1) The total installed cost of the solar energy system option.

(2) The estimated cost savings associated with the solar energy system option, as determined by the commission pursuant to Chapter 8.8 (commencing with Section 25780) of Division 15.

(c) The commission shall develop an offset program that
 allows a developer or seller of production homes to forgo the offer requirement of this section on a project, by installing solar energy systems generating specified amounts of electricity on other projects, including, but not limited to, low-income housing, multifamily, commercial, industrial, and institutional developments. The amount of electricity required to be generated from solar energy systems used as an offset pursuant to this subdivision shall be equal to the amount of electricity generated by solar energy systems installed on a similarly sized project within that climate zone, assuming 20 percent of the prospective buyers would have installed solar energy systems.

(d) The requirements of this section shall not operate as a substitute for the implementation of existing energy efficiency measures, and the requirements of this section shall not result in lower energy savings or lower energy efficiency levels than would otherwise be
 achieved by the full implementation of energy savings and energy efficiency standards established pursuant to Section 25402.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 353, Sec. 21.   (AB 1533)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

25405.6.

Not later than July 1, 2007, the commission shall initiate a public proceeding to study and make findings whether, and under what conditions, solar energy systems should be required on new residential and new nonresidential buildings, including the establishment of numerical targets. As part of the study, the commission may determine that a solar energy system should not be required for any building unless the commission determines, based upon consideration of all costs associated with the system, that the system is cost effective when amortized over the economic life of the structure. When determining the cost-effectiveness of the solar energy system, the commission shall consider the availability of governmental rebates, tax deductions, net-metering, and other quantifiable factors, if the commission can determine the availability of these financial incentives if a solar energy system is made mandatory and not elective. The commission shall periodically update the study and incorporate any revision that the commission determines is necessary, including revisions that reflect changes in the financial incentives originally considered by the commission when determining cost-effectiveness of the solar energy system. For purposes of this section, “solar energy system” means a photovoltaic solar collector or other photovoltaic solar energy device that has a primary purpose of providing for the collection and distribution of solar energy for the generation of electricity. This section is intended to be for study purposes only and does not authorize the commission to develop and adopt any requirement for solar energy systems on either residential or nonresidential buildings.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 132, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5.2. Energy Conservation Assistance [25410. - 25422.]

25410.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Energy Conservation Assistance Act of 1979.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1124.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 25421.)
-------------------------------------------

25410.5.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Energy costs are frequently the second largest discretionary expense in a local government’s budget. According to the commission, most public institutions could reduce their energy costs by 20 to 30 percent.

(b) A variety of energy conservation measures are available to local governments. These measures are highly cost-effective, often providing a payback on the initial investment in three years or less.

(c) Many local governments lack energy management expertise and are often unaware of their high energy costs or the opportunities to reduce those costs.

(d) Local governments that desire to reduce their energy costs through energy conservation and efficiency measures often lack available funding.

(e) Since 1980, the Energy Conservation Assistance Account has provided $110 million in loans, through a revolving loan account, to 600 schools, hospitals, and local governments. The energy conservation projects funded by the account save approximately $35 million annually in energy costs.

(f) Local governments and public institutions need assistance in all aspects of energy efficiency improvements, including, but not limited to, project identification, project development and implementation, evaluation of project proposals and options, operations and maintenance, and troubleshooting of problem projects.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 601, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 25421.)
-------------------------------------------

25410.6.

(a) The commission shall administer the State Energy Conservation Assistance Account to provide grants and loans to local governments and public institutions to maximize energy use savings, expand installation of energy storage systems, and expand the availability of electric vehicle charging infrastructure, including, but not limited to, technical assistance, demonstrations, and identification and implementation of cost-effective energy efficiency, energy storage, and electric vehicle charging infrastructure measures and programs in existing and planned buildings or facilities. An eligible institution may propose a group of multiple projects where the determination of whether the projects are cost effective shall be determined by the cost-effectiveness of those multiple projects bundled
 together.

(b) It is further the intent of the Legislature that the commission seek the assistance of utility companies in providing energy audits for local governments and public institutions and in publicizing the availability of State Energy Conservation Assistance Account funds to qualified entities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 226, Sec. 1.   (AB 33)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 25421.)
-------------------------------------------

25411.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Allocation” means a loan of funds by the commission pursuant to the procedures specified in this chapter.

(b) “Building” means any existing or planned structure that includes a heating or cooling system, or both. Additions to an original building shall be considered part of that building rather than a separate building. “Building” includes a tribal building.

(c) “Eligible institution” means a school, hospital, public care institution, unit of local government, or tribe.

(d) “Energy audit” means a determination of the energy consumption characteristics of a building
 or facility that does all of the following:

(1) Identifies the type, size, and energy use level of the building or facility and the major energy using systems of the building or facility.

(2) Determines appropriate eligible energy maintenance and operating procedures.

(3) Indicates the need, if any, for the acquisition and installation of eligible energy measures.

(e) “Eligible energy maintenance and operating procedure” means a modification or modifications in the maintenance and operations of a building or facility, and any installations therein (based on the use time schedule of the building or facility), that are designed to reduce energy consumption in the building or facility and that require no significant expenditure of funds.

(f) “Eligible energy measure” means an installation or modification of an installation in a building or facility that is primarily intended to reduce energy consumption or peak electricity demand, or that allows the use of an eligible renewable energy resource, an energy storage system, or electric vehicle charging infrastructure.

(g) “Eligible energy project” means an undertaking to acquire and to install one or more eligible energy measures in a building or facility, and technical assistance in connection with that undertaking.

(h) “Facility” means any major energy using system of an eligible institution whether or not housed in a building.

(i) “Hospital” means a public or nonprofit institution that is both of the following:

(1) A general hospital, tuberculosis hospital, or any other type of hospital, other than a hospital furnishing primarily domiciliary care.

(2) Duly authorized to provide hospital services under the laws of this state.

(j) “Hospital building” means a building housing a hospital and related operations, including laboratories, laundries, outpatient departments, nurses’ home and training activities, and central service operations in connection with a hospital, and also includes a building housing education or training activities for health professions personnel operated as an integral part of a hospital.

(k) “Local government building” means a building that is primarily occupied by offices or agencies of a unit of local government or by a public care
 institution.

(l) “Project” means a purpose for which an allocation may be requested and made under this chapter. Those purposes shall include energy audits, eligible energy maintenance and operating procedures, and eligible energy measures in existing and planned buildings and facilities, eligible energy projects, and technical assistance programs.

(m) “Public care institution” means a public or nonprofit institution that owns:

(1) A long-term care institution.

(2) A rehabilitation institution.

(3) An institution for the provision of public health services, including related publicly owned services such as laboratories, clinics, and administrative offices operated in connection with
 the institution.

(4) A residential child care center.

(n) “Public or nonprofit institution” means an institution owned and operated by:

(1) The state, a political subdivision of the state, or an agency or instrumentality of either.

(2) An organization exempt from income tax under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954.

(3) In the case of public care institutions, an organization also exempt from income tax under Section 501(c)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954.

(o) “School” means a public or nonprofit institution, including a local educational agency, which:

(1) Provides, and is legally authorized to provide, elementary education or secondary education, or both, on a day or residential basis.

(2) Provides, and is legally authorized to provide, a program of education beyond secondary education, on a day or residential basis and meets all of the following requirements:

(A) Admits as students only persons having a certificate of graduation from a school providing secondary education, or the recognized equivalent of that certificate.

(B) Is accredited by a nationally recognized accrediting agency or association.

(C) Provides an education program for which it awards a bachelor’s degree or higher degree or provides not less than a two-year program that is
 acceptable for full credit toward a degree at any institution that meets the requirements of subparagraphs (A) and (B) and provides that program.

(3) Provides not less than a one-year program of training to prepare students for gainful employment in a recognized occupation and that meets the provisions of paragraph (2).

(p) “School building” means a building housing classrooms, laboratories, dormitories, athletic facilities, or related facilities operated in connection with a school.

(q) “Technical assistance costs” means costs incurred for the use of existing personnel or the temporary employment of other qualified personnel, or both, necessary for providing technical assistance.

(r) “Technical assistance program” means assistance to schools,
 hospitals, local government, and public care institutions and includes, but is not limited to:

(1) Conducting specialized studies identifying and specifying energy savings and related cost savings that are likely to be realized as a result of:

(A) Modification of maintenance and operating procedures in a building or facility, in addition to those modifications implemented after the preliminary energy audit, or

(B) Acquisition and installation of one or more specified eligible energy measures in the building or facility, or as a result of both.

(C) New construction activities.

(2) Planning of specific remodeling, renovation, repair, replacement, or insulation projects related to the
 installation of eligible energy measures in the building or facility.

(3) Developing and evaluating alternative project implementation methods and proposals.

(s) “Tribe” means a California Native American tribe located in California that is on the contact list maintained by the Native American Heritage Commission for purposes of Chapter 905 of the Statutes of 2004.

(t) “Tribal building” means a building that is owned, or primarily used, by a tribe located within or outside of Indian country, located in California, and primarily occupied by any of the following:

(1) Offices or agencies of a tribe.

(2) A health facility operated by a tribe in accordance with applicable federal operating
 requirements.

(3) Other facilities operated by a tribe that provide or promote tribal services for tribal members and the surrounding communities. Facilities may include a gaming facility or a portion of a gaming facility, to the extent the facility is used as a community emergency response center or a resource center for deenergization events, or other centralized areas for nongaming community services in designated situations.

(u) “Unit of local government” means a unit of general purpose government below the state, a special district, or any combination of that unit and special district formed for the joint exercise of power.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 226, Sec. 2.   (AB 33)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 25421.)
-------------------------------------------

25412.

Any eligible institution may submit an application to the commission for an allocation for the purpose of financing all or a portion of the costs incurred in implementing a project. The application shall be in such form and contain such information as the commission shall prescribe.

An application may be for the purpose of financing the eligible institution’s share of such costs which are to be jointly funded through a state, local, or federal-local program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1124.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 25421.)
-------------------------------------------

25412.5.

The commission shall take steps to solicit loan applications to do all of the following:

(a) Encourage an equitable distribution of loans statewide.

(b) Award loans for eligible energy projects or measures in regions with high summer peak loads, with high heating costs, or that have electrical or natural gas system distribution constraints.

(c) Place an emphasis on offering these loans in disadvantaged communities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 226, Sec. 3.   (AB 33)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 25421.)
-------------------------------------------

25413.

(a) Applications for eligible energy projects or measures may be approved by the commission only in those instances where the eligible institution has furnished information satisfactory to the commission that the costs of the project, plus interest on state funds loaned, calculated in accordance with Section 25415, will be recovered through savings in the cost of energy to the institution during the repayment period of the allocation.

(b) An eligible institution may propose to bundle multiple projects where the determination of whether the costs of the projects, plus interest on state funds loaned, will be recovered through savings during the repayment period of the allocation and shall be determined by the savings of those
 multiple projects bundled together.

(c) The savings shall be calculated in a manner prescribed by the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 226, Sec. 4.   (AB 33)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 25421.)
-------------------------------------------

25414.

Annually at the conclusion of each fiscal year, but not later than October 31, each eligible institution that has received an allocation for an eligible energy project or measures pursuant to this chapter shall compute the cost of energy saved as a result of implementing an eligible energy project or measures, or bundled projects or measures, funded by the allocation. The cost shall be calculated in a manner prescribed by the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 226, Sec. 5.   (AB 33)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 25421.)
-------------------------------------------

25415.

(a) Each eligible institution to which an allocation has been made under this chapter shall repay the principal amount of the allocation, plus interest, in not more than 40 equal semiannual payments, as determined by the commission. Loan repayments shall be made in accordance with a schedule established by the commission. The repayment period shall not exceed the life of the equipment, as determined by the commission or the lease term of the building in which the eligible energy, energy storage, or electric vehicle charging infrastructure project or measures will be installed. 

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, the commission shall, unless it determines that the purposes of this chapter would be better served by establishing an alternative interest rate schedule,
 periodically set interest rates on the loans based on surveys of existing financial markets and may authorize no-interest loans.

(c) The governing body of each eligible institution shall annually budget an amount at least sufficient to make the semiannual payments required in this section. For an eligible energy project or measures, the amount shall not be raised by the levy of additional taxes but shall instead be obtained by a savings in energy costs or other sources.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 226, Sec. 6.   (AB 33)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 25421.)
-------------------------------------------

25416.

(a) The State Energy Conservation Assistance Account is hereby created in the General Fund. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the account is continuously appropriated to the commission without regard to fiscal year.

(b) The moneys in the account shall consist of all moneys authorized or required to be deposited in the account by the Legislature and all moneys received by the commission pursuant to Sections 25414 and 25415.

(c) The moneys in the account shall be disbursed by the Controller for the purposes of this chapter as authorized by the commission.

(d) The commission may contract and provide grants for services to
 be performed for eligible institutions. Services may include, but are not limited to, feasibility analysis, project design, field assistance, and operation and training. The amount expended for those services shall not exceed 10 percent of the unencumbered balance of the account as determined by the commission on July 1 of each year.

(e) The commission may make grants to eligible institutions for innovative projects and programs. Except as provided in subdivision (d), the amount expended for grants shall not exceed 5 percent of the annual unencumbered balance in the account as determined by the commission on July 1 of each fiscal year.

(f) The commission may charge a fee for the services provided under subdivision (d).

(g) Notwithstanding any other law, the Controller may use the State Energy Conservation Assistance
 Account for loans to the General Fund as provided in Sections 16310 and 16381 of the Government Code.

(h) (1) A subaccount is hereby created within the State Energy Conservation Assistance Account to track the award and repayment of loans, including principal, interest, and interest earnings on or accruing to the subaccount, made with moneys transferred to the account from the Greenhouse Gas Reduction Fund, created pursuant to Section 16428.8 of the Government Code. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the moneys in the subaccount are hereby continuously appropriated to the commission without regard to fiscal year.

(2) Moneys deposited in the subaccount may be used for loans only for projects in buildings owned and operated by a state agency or entity, including, without limitation, the University of California and California State
 University.

(3) Notwithstanding Section 39718 of the Health and Safety Code, a repayment of a loan made pursuant to this chapter with moneys transferred from the Greenhouse Gas Reduction Fund shall be deposited in the subaccount and shall be available for a loan made to an entity eligible for these moneys pursuant to this subdivision.

(i) (1) A subaccount is hereby created in the State Energy Conservation Assistance Account to track the award and repayment of loans to tribes, including principal, interest, and interest earnings on or accruing to the subaccount. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the moneys in the subaccount are continuously appropriated to the commission without regard to fiscal year.

(2) Moneys deposited in the subaccount shall be used for loans only to
 tribes.

(3) The commission may transfer moneys from the account to provide funding for the subaccount or transfer moneys from the subaccount to the account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 226, Sec. 7.   (AB 33)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 25421.)
-------------------------------------------

25417.

(a) An allocation made pursuant to this chapter shall be used for the purposes specified in an approved application.

(b) In the event that the commission determines that an allocation has been expended for purposes other than those specified in an approved application, it shall immediately request the return of the full amount of the allocation. The eligible institution shall immediately comply with such request.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1124.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 25421.)
-------------------------------------------

25417.5.

(a) In furtherance of the purposes of the commission as set forth in this chapter, the commission has the power and authority to do all of the following:

(1) Borrow money, for the purpose of obtaining funds to make loans pursuant to this chapter, from the California Economic Development Financing Authority, the California Infrastructure and Economic Development Bank, and the California Consumer Power and Conservation Financing Authority from the proceeds of revenue bonds issued by any of those agencies.

(2) Pledge collateral to secure the repayment of moneys borrowed pursuant to paragraph (1) or of bonds or other borrowings by the California Infrastructure and Economic Development Bank. The commission may pledge, as collateral for these purposes, the loans made pursuant to this chapter or former Chapter 5.4 (commencing with Section 25440) or the principal and interest payments on loans made pursuant to this chapter or former Chapter 5.4 (commencing with Section 25440). These pledges shall be subject to Chapter 5.5 (commencing with Section 5450) of Division 6 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(3) Sell loans made pursuant to this chapter or former Chapter 5.4 (commencing with Section 25440), at prices determined in the sole discretion of the commission, to the California Economic